North Dakota, session 69, SB2007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
veterans' home for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the veterans' home, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $20,582,989 $1,815,877 $22,398,866
New and vacant FTE pool 0 852,924 852,924
Operating expenses 6,061,325 1,207,368 7,268,693
Capital assets 407,252 725,055 1,132,307
Total all funds $27,051,566 $4,601,224 $31,652,790
Less other funds 20,833,167 4,106,515 24,939,682
Total general fund $6,218,399 $494,709 $6,713,108
Full-time equivalent positions 114.79 0.00 114.79
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description Other Funds
Building maintenance $390,000
Resident garages and storage units 175,000
Equipment 22,050
Total $587,050
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
veterans' home may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 37-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2007 - PAGE 2
Meals provided to employees of the veterans' home.
In the event of a disruption of operations, the veterans' home may provide meals at a fair value or
without a charge to employees of the veterans' home as required by the job assignments of the
employees.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTION - LINE ITEM TRANSFERS - REPORT. Notwithstanding section
54-16-04, the director of the office of management and budget may transfer up to $600,000 from
special funds from the salaries and wages line item to the operating expenses line item in section 1 of
chapter 7 of the 2023 Session Laws, during the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and
ending June 30, 2025, as requested by the veterans' home. The veterans' home shall notify the
legislative council of any transfers made pursuant to this section.
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - VETERANS' HOME FACILITIES. During
the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the usage of the veterans'
home facilities. The study must consider any organizational changes necessary to increase resident
census at the veterans' home, potential uses for unoccupied space, and federal requirements. The
legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 7. EMERGENCY. Section 5 of this Act and the sum of $175,000 appropriated from the
Melvin Norgard memorial fund for resident garages and storage units in the other funds line item in
section 1 of this Act are declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2007 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2007 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State